Arkansas, session 2025, SB15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-43-205 is repealed.
15-43-205. Negligent discharge of firearms while hunting deer.
(a) The General Assembly has become aware of the fact that many
persons hunting deer in this state negligently allow their firearms to be
discharged without exercising proper care to ascertain the object at which
they shoot, thereby endangering the life, limb, and property of other
persons. It is the intent of this section to deter the negligent use of
firearms by deer hunters by imposing penalties therefor.
(b) A person who, while hunting deer, negligently discharges a firearm
in such circumstances as to endanger the person or property of another shall
be fined in an amount not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000) or may be imprisoned in the county jail for a
period not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, or be
both fined and imprisoned.


*CEB049*
12/20/2024 10:12:09 AM CEB049